Utah statutes.
41-1a-1402.   Report by owners or lienholders of thefts and recoveries.
(1) (a)  The owner, or person having a lien or encumbrance upon a vehicle,
vessel, or outboard motor that has been stolen, may notify the law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction where the theft occurred.
(b)  In the event of an embezzlement the owner or person may make a report
only after having procured the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the
person charged with embezzlement.
(2) (a)  If a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is recovered, an owner or
other person who has given any notice under Subsection (1) shall notify the
law enforcement agency where the theft or embezzlement was reported.
(b)  The law enforcement agency shall notify the Criminal Investigations and
Technical Services Division, established in Section 53-10-103, of recovery.
